apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<pardef n="h/ai__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ai</l>        <r>ai<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ai</l>        <r>ai<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ái</l>        <r>ai<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_b"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Muxia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Artai__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Imaxin__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="UNESCO__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="IVE__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="EEUU__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="CCOO__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="diesel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="júnior__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="conde__n">
  <e>       <p><l>sas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sa</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="júnior__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="diabetes__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dpt.__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Univ.__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Dr/.__n">
  <e>       <p><l>as.</l>       <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a.</l>        <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es.</l>       <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>.</l>         <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ntr/o.__n">
  <e>       <p><l>as.</l>       <r>o.<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a.</l>        <r>o.<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os.</l>       <r>o.<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o.</l>        <r>o.<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Avda/.__n">
  <e>       <p><l>s.</l>        <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>.</l>         <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Tel/.__n">
  <e>       <p><l>s.</l>        <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>.</l>         <r>.<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="contacontos__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="talibá/n__n">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="talibá/n__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vacú/n__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bailar/ín__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íns</l>       <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bailar/ín__n">
  <e>       <p><l>inas</l>      <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>íns</l>       <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ín</l>        <r>ín<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="col__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="lor_d__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="parch_ís__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ís</l>        <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="comp/ás__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ases</l>      <r>ás<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ás</l>        <r>ás<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/olmen__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ólmenes</l>   <r>olmen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olmen</l>     <r>olmen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="antinéboa"><i>antinéboa</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bailar"><i>bailar</i><par n="bailar/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="danzar"><i>danzar</i><par n="bailar/ín__adj"/></e>
<e lm="diésel"><i>diésel</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="júnior"><i>júnior</i><par n="júnior__adj"/></e>
<e lm="molotov"><i>molotov</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="monovolume"><i>monovolume</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="porno"><i>porno</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="reggae"><i>reggae</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="soul"><i>soul</i><par n="diesel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sénior"><i>sénior</i><par n="júnior__adj"/></e>
<e lm="talibán"><i>talibá</i><par n="talibá/n__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vacún"><i>vacú</i><par n="vacú/n__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ANP"><i>ANP</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="Agal"><i>Agal</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="Avda."><i>Avda</i><par n="Avda/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="Bce"><i>Bce</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="CAF"><i>CAF</i><par n="EEUU__n"/></e>
<e lm="CCOO"><i>CCOO</i><par n="CCOO__n"/></e>
<e lm="CE"><i>CE</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="CSIC"><i>CSIC</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="CV"><i>CV</i><par n="EEUU__n"/></e>
<e lm="DXT"><i>DXT</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="Dna."><i>Dna</i><par n="Avda/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="EEUU"><i>EEUU</i><par n="EEUU__n"/></e>
<e lm="Estr."><i>Estr</i><par n="Avda/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="FARC"><i>FARC</i><par n="CCOO__n"/></e>
<e lm="FEGATRAMER"><i>FEGATRAMER</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="FIDAC"><i>FIDAC</i><par n="EEUU__n"/></e>
<e lm="Fcc"><i>Fcc</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="ITV"><i>ITV</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="Iae"><i>Iae</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="Msc"><i>Msc</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="Nso."><i>Ns</i><par n="Ntr/o.__n"/></e>
<e lm="PSV"><i>PSV</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="RFET"><i>RFET</i><par n="UNESCO__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sto."><i>St</i><par n="Ntr/o.__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sup"><i>Sup</i><par n="IVE__n"/></e>
<e lm="Tel."><i>Tel</i><par n="Tel/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="Telf."><i>Telf</i><par n="Tel/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="Teléf."><i>Teléf</i><par n="Tel/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="UUAA"><i>UUAA</i><par n="CCOO__n"/></e>
<e lm="Univ."><i>Univ.</i><par n="Univ.__n"/></e>
<e lm="bailar"><i>bailar</i><par n="bailar/ín__n"/></e>
<e lm="cf."><i>cf.</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="col"><i>col</i><par n="col__n"/></e>
<e lm="compás"><i>comp</i><par n="comp/ás__n"/></e>
<e lm="conde"><i>conde</i><par n="conde__n"/></e>
<e lm="contacontos"><i>contacontos</i><par n="contacontos__n"/></e>
<e lm="córner"><i>córner</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="dolmen"><i>d</i><par n="d/olmen__n"/></e>
<e lm="danzar"><i>danzar</i><par n="bailar/ín__n"/></e>
<e lm="diabetes"><i>diabetes</i><par n="diabetes__n"/></e>
<e lm="dpt."><i>dpt.</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="dr"><i>dr</i><par n="Dr/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="esq"><i>esq</i><par n="diabetes__n"/></e>
<e lm="ex."><i>ex</i><par n="Tel/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="gardacostas"><i>gardacostas</i><par n="contacontos__n"/></e>
<e lm="internet"><i>internet</i><par n="Univ.__n"/></e>
<e lm="islam"><i>islam</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="izq."><i>izq.</i><par n="Univ.__n"/></e>
<e lm="izqda."><i>izqda.</i><par n="Univ.__n"/></e>
<e lm="júnior"><i>júnior</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="kg."><i>kg.</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="lord"><i>lor</i><par n="lor_d__n"/></e>
<e lm="m."><i>m.</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="mecenas"><i>mecenas</i><par n="contacontos__n"/></e>
<e lm="monopraza"><i>monopraza</i><par n="contacontos__n"/></e>
<e lm="máster"><i>máster</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="míster"><i>míster</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="parchís"><i>parch</i><par n="parch_ís__n"/></e>
<e lm="pechacancelas"><i>pechacancelas</i><par n="contacontos__n"/></e>
<e lm="profesorado"><i>profesorado</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="páncreas"><i>páncreas</i><par n="contacontos__n"/></e>
<e lm="páx."><i>páx</i><par n="Avda/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="póster"><i>póster</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="sep"><i>sep</i><par n="dpt.__n"/></e>
<e lm="sr."><i>sr</i><par n="Dr/.__n"/></e>
<e lm="sénior"><i>sénior</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="talibán"><i>talibá</i><par n="talibá/n__n"/></e>
<e lm="tráiler"><i>tráiler</i><par n="júnior__n"/></e>
<e lm="Aerostar"><i>Aerostar</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amedo"><i>Amedo</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anquela del Ducado"><i>Anquela<b/>del<b/>Ducado</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aprevar"><i>Aprevar</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Baus"><i>Baus</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Caleiro"><i>Caleiro</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Clio"><i>Clio</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Córsega"><i>Córsega</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dennis"><i>Dennis</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Feve"><i>Feve</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Forcarei"><i>Forcarei</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Honorato"><i>Honorato</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Malta"><i>Malta</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mamés"><i>Mamés</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Manzanal"><i>Manzanal</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pont"><i>Pont</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ramadán"><i>Ramadán</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ribadavia"><i>Ribadavia</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tenorio"><i>Tenorio</i><par n="Artai__np"/></e>
<e lm="Villagarcía del Llano"><i>Villagarcía<b/>del<b/>Llano</i><par n="Muxia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vizoño"><i>Vizoño</i><par n="Imaxin__np"/></e>
<e lm="hai"><i>h</i><par n="h/ai__vblex"/></e>
